Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.130

Grant county.

Grant county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Beginning at the southeast corner of township seventeen north, range thirty east of the Willamette Meridian, thence running west on the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen to the range line between ranges twenty-seven and twenty-eight; thence south on said range line to the section line between sections twenty-four and twenty-five in township fourteen north, range twenty-seven east; thence west on said section line to the midchannel of the Columbia river; thence up the channel of the river to a point, thence at right angles to the course of said channel to the meander corner of section thirteen, township twenty north, range twenty-two east Willamette Meridian, and section eighteen, township twenty north, range twenty-three east Willamette Meridian; thence north along the range line between ranges twenty-two and twenty-three to the northwest corner of section eighteen, township twenty-one north, range twenty-three east Willamette Meridian; thence east one mile to the southeast corner section seven, township twenty-one, range twenty-three east; north one mile to the northwest corner section eight, township twenty-one, range twenty-three east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section five, township twenty-one, range twenty-three east; north one mile to the northeast corner section five, township twenty-one, range twenty-three east; east one mile to the northeast corner of section four, township twenty-one, range twenty-three east; north one mile to the southeast corner section twenty-eight, township twenty-two, range twenty-three east; east one mile to the southeast corner section twenty-seven, township twenty-two, range twenty-three east; north two miles to the northeast corner of section twenty-two, township twenty-two, range twenty-three east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section fourteen, township twenty-two, range twenty-three east; north one mile to the southeast corner section eleven, township twenty-two, range twenty-three east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section twelve, township twenty-two, range twenty-three east; north two miles to the northwest corner of section six, township twenty-two north, range twenty-four east; east sixteen miles to the northeast corner of section three, township twenty-two north, range twenty-six east; north six miles to the northeast corner of section three, township twenty-three north, range twenty-six east; east one mile to the northeast corner of section two, township twenty-three north, range twenty-six east; north one mile to the northeast corner of section thirty-five, township twenty-four north, range twenty-six east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section twenty-five, township twenty-four north, range twenty-six east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section twenty-four, township twenty-four north, range twenty-six east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section nineteen, township twenty-four north, range twenty-seven east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section eighteen, township twenty-four north, range twenty-seven east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section seventeen, township twenty-four north, range twenty-seven east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section eight, township twenty-four north, range twenty-seven east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section nine, township twenty-four north, range twenty-seven east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section four, township twenty-four north, range twenty-seven east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section three, township twenty-four, range twenty-seven east; north one mile to the northeast corner of section three, township twenty-four, range twenty-seven east; east three miles to the southeast corner of section thirty-one, township twenty-five north, range twenty-eight east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section thirty, township twenty-five north, range twenty-eight east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section twenty-nine, township twenty-five north, range twenty-eight east; north three miles to the southeast corner of section eight, township twenty-five north, range twenty-eight east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section nine, township twenty-five north, range twenty-eight east; north four miles to the southeast corner of section twenty-one, township twenty-six north, range twenty-eight east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section twenty-two, township twenty-six north, range twenty-eight east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section fifteen, township twenty-six north, range twenty-eight east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section fourteen, township twenty-six north, range twenty-eight east; north two miles to the southeast corner of section two, township twenty-six north, range twenty-eight east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section one, township twenty-six north, range twenty-eight east; north two miles to the southeast corner of section twenty-five, township twenty-seven north, range twenty-eight east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section thirty, township twenty-seven north, range twenty-nine east; north six miles to the southeast corner of section thirty, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section twenty-nine, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section twenty, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; east two miles to the southeast corner of section twenty-two, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; north one mile to the southeast corner of section fifteen, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section fourteen, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; north two miles to the southeast corner of section two, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; east one mile to the southeast corner of section one, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; north one mile to the northeast corner of section one, township twenty-eight north, range twenty-nine east; thence east along township line between townships twenty-eight and twenty-nine to the midchannel of the Columbia river; thence up said channel of said river to the point where the Columbia Guide Meridian intersects said channel; thence running south on said Columbia Guide Meridian to the place of beginning.

[ 1909 c 17 s 1; RRS s 3937.]